da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Styrkeløft: Curlingkoste; Curlinghandsker; Curlingsko; Curlingsten; Træningshjælpemidler til curling
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Curling: Curlingbezems; Curlinghandschoenen; Curlingschoenen; Curlingstenen; Hulpmiddelen voor curlingtraining
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Vihanje: Metle za curling; Rokavice za curling; Čevlji za curling; Kamniki za curling; Pripomočki za trening curlinga
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Curling: Metly na curling; Rukavice na curling; Topánky na curling; Kameny na curling; Tréningové pomôcky na curling
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Curling: Curlingharjat; Curling-käsineet; Curlingkengät; Curlingkivet; Curlingin harjoitteluvälineet
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Curling: Curling Süpürgeleri; Körling eldivenleri; Curling Ayakkabıları; Curling Taşları; Curling Antrenman Yardımcıları
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > カーリング: カーリングブラシ; カーリング用グローブ; カーリングシューズ; カーリングストーン; カーリング練習器具
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > เคอร์ลิง: ไม้กวาดสำหรับเล่นเคอร์ลิง; ถุงมือเคอร์ลิง; รองเท้าสำหรับเล่นเคอร์ลิง; หินสำหรับเล่นเคอร์ลิง; อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกเคิร์ลลิง
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Curling: Curling seprűk; Curling kesztyűk; Curling cipők; Curling kövek; Curling edzési segédeszközök
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Ondulare: Mături de ondulat; Mănuși pentru curling; Încălțăminte pentru curling; Pietre de curling; Articole pentru antrenament de curling
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Curling: Balais de curling; Gants de curling; Chaussures de curling; Pierres de curling; Aides à l’entraînement au curling
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Rizado: Escobas de curling; Guantes de curling; Calzado de curling; Piedras de curling; Ayudas para el entrenamiento de curling
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Curling: Curlingsopar; Curlinghandskar; Curlingskor; Curlingstenar; Hjälpmedel för curling
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Curling: Miotły do curlingu; Rękawice do curlingu; Buty do curlingu; Kamienie do curlingu; Pomoce treningowe do curlingu
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Curling: Scope da curling; Guanti da curling; Scarpe da curling; Pietre da curling; Accessori per l’allenamento del curling
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 컬링: 컬링 브룸; 컬링 장갑; 컬링 슈즈; 컬링 스톤; 컬링 훈련 보조기구
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bi đá trên băng: Chổi bi đá trên băng; Găng tay Curling; Giày bi đá trên băng; Đá cho môn bi đá trên băng; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện bi đá trên băng
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Curling: Vassouras de curling; Luvas de curling; Tênis de curling; Pedras de curling; Equipamentos de treinamento de curling
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Curling: Curlingbesen; Curling-Handschuhe; Curlingschuhe; Curlingsteine; Curling-Trainingshilfen
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 冰壶: 冰壶刷; 冰壶手套; 冰壶鞋; 冰壶石; 冰壶训练辅助用品
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Curling: Curling Brooms; Curling Gloves; Curling Shoes; Curling Stones; Curling Training Aids
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 冰壺: 冰壺刷; 冰壺手套; 冰壺鞋; 冰壺石; 冰壺訓練輔具
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Κέρλινγκ: Σκούπες για κέρλινγκ; Γάντια κέρλινγκ; Παπούτσια για κέρλινγκ; Πέτρες κέρλινγκ; Εκπαιδευτικά βοηθήματα για κέρλινγκ
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Керлинг: Щетки для керлинга; Перчатки для керлинга; Обувь для керлинга; Камни для керлинга; Тренировочный инвентарь для керлинга
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Кърлинг: Метли за кърлинг; Ръкавици за кърлинг; Обувки за кърлинг; Камъни за кърлинг; Помощни средства за тренировки по кърлинг
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Curling: Vassouras de curling; Luvas de curling; Sapatos de curling; Pedras de curling; Auxiliares de treino para curling
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Curling: Curlingová košťata; Rukavice na curling; Curlingová obuv; Curlingové kameny; Curlingové tréninkové pomůcky
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Curling: Metle za curling; Rukavice za curling; Cipele za curling; Kamenje za curling; Pomagala za trening curlinga
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Curling: Curlingkoster; Curlinghansker; Curlingsko; Curlingsteiner; Treningsutstyr for curling
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Kerlingas: Kerlingo šluotos; Kerlingo pirštinės; Kerlingo batai; Kerlingo akmenys; Kerlingo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės